District of Columbia statutes.
32-1332

Pre-apprenticeship program.

(a)

The Mayor, subject to the annual appropriation of funds, shall establish and administer a pre-apprenticeship program to assist District residents in meeting the requirements for registered apprenticeship programs.

(b)

This program may include academic remediation, classroom-related instruction, other educational training, and on-the-job training in occupational skills necessary for entry into existing or registered new apprenticeship programs.

(c)

The Mayor may enter into agreements with local unions and employers to provide pre-apprenticeship assistance. In selecting participants for pre-apprenticeship programs, the Mayor may give priority to residents of persistent problem areas.

History

Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2103, 52 DCR 7503

Section References

This section is referenced in § 1-328.05.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 day) addition, see § 2103 of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).